Hawaii statutes.
§701-106 Territorial applicability.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person may be convicted
under the law of this State of an offense committed by the person's own conduct
or the conduct of another for which the person is legally accountable if:

(a) Either the conduct or the result which is an
element of the offense occurs within this State;

(b) Conduct occurring outside the State is
sufficient under the law of this State to constitute an attempt to commit an
offense within the State;

(c) Conduct occurring outside the State is
sufficient under the law of this State to constitute a conspiracy to commit an
offense within the State and an overt act in furtherance of such conspiracy
occurs within the State;

(d) Conduct occurring within the State establishes
complicity in the commission of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
commit, an offense in another jurisdiction which also is an offense under the
law of this State;

(e) The offense consists of the omission, while
within or outside this State to perform a legal duty imposed by the law of this
State with respect to domicile, residence, or a relationship to a person,
thing, or transaction in the State; or

(f) The offense is based on a statute of this State
which expressly prohibits conduct outside the State, when the conduct bears a
reasonable relation to a legitimate interest of this State and the actor knows
that the actor's conduct is likely to affect that interest.

(2) Subsection (1)(a) does not apply when a
specified result, or conduct creating a risk of such a result, is an element of
an offense and the result occurs, or is intended or is likely to occur, only in
another jurisdiction where the conduct charged would not constitute an offense,
unless a legislative purpose plainly appears to declare that the conduct
constitutes an offense regardless of the place of the result.

(3) Subsection (1)(a) does not apply when a
particular result is an element of an offense and the result is caused by
conduct occurring outside the State which conduct would not constitute an
offense if the result had occurred there, unless the actor intentionally or
knowingly caused the result within the State.

(4) When the offense involves a homicide,
either the death of the victim or the bodily impact causing death constitutes a
"result", within the meaning of subsection (1)(a). If the body of a
homicide victim is found within the State, it is prima facie evidence that the
result occurred within the State.

(5) This State includes the land and water and
the air space about the land and water with respect to which the State has
legislative jurisdiction. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1993]

Revision Note

In subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), and (d), "or"
deleted pursuant to §23G-15.

COMMENTARY ON §701-106

The intent of this section is to expand the penal
jurisdiction of Hawaii's courts to the fullest extent possible, within the
limits of fundamental fairness and constitutionality. (It does not govern the
jurisdiction of individual courts.) The section therefore makes the penal law
of this State applicable to conduct or results occurring within the State; to
conduct within the State which establishes complicity in, or constitutes an
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit, an offense in another
jurisdiction which is also an offense under Hawaii law; and to a penal omission
to perform a duty imposed by Hawaii law. Certain kinds of conduct occurring
outside the State are also covered: conduct outside the State which is
sufficient under this Code to constitute an attempt to commit an offense under
the laws of this State, conduct outside the State which is sufficient under
this Code to constitute a conspiracy to commit a crime within the State
(provided that an overt act in furtherance of the conspiracy occurs within the
State), and conduct outside the State expressly prohibited by Hawaii law "when
the conduct bears a reasonable relation to a legitimate interest of this State
and the actor knows that the actor's conduct is likely to affect that interest."

Subsections (2) and (3) provide exceptions to the coverage of
subsection (1). Subsection (2) excepts conduct which causes, or creates the
risk of causing, a result in another jurisdiction where the conduct does not
constitute an offense in the other jurisdiction, unless the statute clearly
indicates a purpose to make the conduct penal regardless of the place of the
result. Subsection (3) relieves the actor of criminality for a result
occurring in this State if it is a result of conduct outside the State which
would not have been an offense there, provided that the actor did not
intentionally or knowingly cause the result within this State. Both
subsections recognize that culpability does not exist in the situations
described, and recognize that the actor probably intended to abide by the law
of the other jurisdiction.

Subsection (4) provides a special rule for homicide cases,
giving the State jurisdiction either when death occurs within the State or when
the bodily impact causing death occurs within the State. It also establishes a
rule that evidence that the body of a homicide victim is found within the State
is prima facie evidence that either death or bodily impact causing death
occurred within the State.

Subsection (5) is intended to encompass the entire
territorial area over which the State has legislative jurisdiction.

The territorial applicability of the previous Hawaii penal
law was defined by statute.[1] The penal liability of a person outside the
State of Hawaii occurred:

Where an act is done or a fact of
effect takes place within the State, affecting the welfare of the State,
or the personal safety, the property or rights of any of its inhabitants, being
within the State, any person causing, procuring, machinating or promoting
the same, or instigating another thereto, or aiding or assisting therein, is
amenable to the laws of the State, whether he be at the time within or
without its limits.[2]

Offenses partly within the State were also covered:

Where the commission of an offense
commenced without the State, is consummated within it, the offender
is subject to be prosecuted and punished therefor in the State.[3]

The case law pertaining to territorial applicability upholds
and supports the above statutes. In Territory v. Hart,[4] it was held that the
trial court in Hawaii had jurisdiction over a defendant who cabled from
Honolulu to New York directing a broker in New York to sell certain stock which
was in the defendant's control for a client, the proceeds of which the defendant
had embezzled. The controlling factor in the court's decision was that the
crime had been commenced within Hawaii. In The King v. Chock Hoon,[5] it was
held that the defendant was guilty of embezzlement within the Kingdom where the
defendant received X's money for the purpose of delivering that money to X's
mother in China, and having failed to deliver the money, refused to return the
money to X after returning to the Kingdom from China.

Case Notes

For purposes of establishing subject matter jurisdiction,
telephone call constitutes conduct in the jurisdiction in which the call is
received. 72 H. 591, 825 P.2d 1062 (1992).

Circuit court had jurisdiction under subsection (1)(d) over
defendant where defendant's call to Honolulu police department from mainland
constituted overt act in Hawaii and co-defendant committed one act in
furtherance of conspiracy by meeting in Honolulu with undercover agents to
discuss drug transaction. 83 H. 187, 925 P.2d 357 (1996).

Where the State charged defendant based on defendant's
conduct in Kona, county and State of Hawaii, defendant was subject to the State's
criminal jurisdiction; defendant's apparent claim to be a citizen of the
Hawaiian Kingdom and not of the State did not exempt defendant from application
of the State's laws. 128 H. 479, 291 P.3d 377 (2013).

The State's criminal jurisdiction encompasses all areas
within the territorial boundaries of the State of Hawaii. 105 H. 319 (App.),
97 P.3d 395 (2004).

Where a Hawaii county ordinance made the enforcement of
marijuana laws the lowest enforcement priority in the county, the ordinance was
preempted by state laws governing the investigation and prosecution of alleged
violations of the Hawaii Penal Code concerning the adult personal use of
cannabis. 132 H. 511 (App.), 323 P.3d 155 (2014).

__________

§701-106 Commentary:

1. H.R.S. §§701-5, 701-6.

2. Id. §701-5 (emphasis added).

3. Id. §701-6 (emphasis added).

4. 24 Haw. 844 (1918).

5. 5 Haw. 372 (1885).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next